Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4302
Possession by dealer; payment of tax required.

No dealer may possess marijuana or controlled substances upon which a tax is imposed by section 77-4303 unless the tax has been paid on the marijuana or controlled substance as evidenced by an official stamp, label, or other indicium.

Laws 1990, LB 260, § 2.